CHAPTER III 


PRINTED BOOKS 


The publishers of commercially suc- 
cessful books have very little occasion to 
study the cost curve of editions in the 
Peni OMTOe DOO VetulG LS thiserange 
in edition size that library demand and 
scholarly interest indicate as the most im- 
portant in the reproduction of research ma-— 
terials. The cost curve behaves very 
Ssurangely in this) zone, so that the judg— 
ment of busines men acquainted with large- 
editicn printing may be of little value 
here. How can these costs be analyzed most 
clearly, and the respective places of the 
various techniques of book production de- 
termined? 

The stages of book production sepa-— 
rate costs into three primary elements: a 
litre, cos," incurred regardless of the 
suze vor tne: €dition; a "running cost," 
varying with the size of edition; anda 
"reprint cost," incurred when an editionis 
exhausted and a new printing made from 
plates. The reprint cost is independent of 
ome Ze mon muIvem sO Orla Gme Cait Ome med Geel Seal 
PancoeoOt second Nlirst cost," followed. by a 
running cost that varies with the size of 
edition. 

Wave sees COS ais sige whival salloike 
into two very important elements: composi- 
tion costs, here defined as all costs that 
vary with the number of words; and area 
costs, which are those that vary with the 
area of paper used in a single copy. Com- 
position costs are found in typewriting 
and wiainotypineswarea cosus are found) san 
some of the pressroom operations. To print 
in large type rather than in small affects 
principally area costs, not composition 
costs, because it means spreading the same 
number of words over more paper; to repro- 
duce by photolithography is to render area 
costs paramount elements of first cost. Re- 
DigiiMGECOS Gomer cimmeC TOG aL sp Gina meee Dy: 
storing type (rates running around $.01 per 
page per month) , or by making stereotypes 
and ellectrotypes; in photo-offset, by sav— 
ing the metal sheets; in mimeographing, by 


13 





AND REPRINTS 


saving the stencils. 

The librarian receives as a_ book 
any bound volume, however it may have been 
manufactured. Library shelves give their 
Space to many bound volumes of photostated 
pages (mostly copies of rare books) and 
many bound volumes of typescript (mostly 
theses). Occasionally a bound volume pro- 
duced by the mimeograph finds its way to 
the shelves. In recent years there have 
been a number of books produced by the 
photo-offset method from typescript master 
copies. Many reprints of old books are 
manufactured by photo-offset. Such parvenu 
volumes, invading the library shelves, are 
regarded with no little contempt by the ex- 
ponents of established printing press prod- 
ucts already in possession. How far are 
these different techniques suitable for the 
production of books? How is the field to 
be allotted among them? 

Here it is necessary to note that 
the book itself is challenged, even in the 
library. The vertical file, housing an ar- 
ray of unbound memoranda, pamphlets, propa- 
ganda matter, broadsides, and other materi- 
als, some of permanent value and some 
ephemeral, has come into the library refer- 
ence room to take business away from the 
bookshelves. And now from another quarter 
comes the possible development of reduced 
copies on film of material to be read by 
projection, threatening the books with more 
serious technological unemployment. Not 
only the ordinary printed book of the con- 
ventional form, but even the book itself is 
placed in a competitive position where it 
once possessed a monopoly. Lt will require 
no little care to make sure that competi- 
tion between the book and its rivals is 
regulated in the best interests of scholar- 
Siar 

The starting point of an analysis 
of the. technological problem of book pro- 
duction is a fundamental distinction to be 
made between two types of cost behavior, 
instanced by the photostat+:on the one hand, 


14 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





When cop- 
ies are multiplied by the photostat or in 
miniature film copies, no matter how large 


Lee prianbine press son eunenouners 


the edition, the cost per copy stands con- 
Stant. The elenent of "first cos Giasmab— 
sent; running costs alone prevail. This 
was the cost situation of all multiplying 
of writing before Gutenberg. The inven- 
VOM Men OR iMiGd a Sea hROcuceG some Sacullel ua oimmlia 
which the cost per copy fell as the size of 
the edition increased. For purposes of 
convenience all those techniques which op- 
erate on a cost system resembling printing 
will be analyzed first, and those tech-— 
niques which operate on or near a pre- 
Gutenberg cost basis will be analyzed lat- 
er. 

Of the techniques operating on the 
system resembling printing (i.e., with a 
substantial distinction between first costs 
and running costs), several classifications 
are possible. The one that will probably 
appeal to scholars as the most natural 
would distinguish between those techniques 
which produce a book printed in the kind of 
book type with which they are familiar, and 
those which produce a book printed in type- 
SGI G. 

Of the techniques yielding a prod- 
uct in print-face type, there are two that 
are available for putting new material into 
book form: these are printing from raised 
type on a flat-bed cylinder press, and 
printing from raised type on a multigraph- 
ing machine. Two other techniques are 
available for making new books from photo- 
graphs of old ones. These are the photo- 
offset method, which has many names, and 
the "dermaprint" method. The photo-offset 
process works from a negative photographic 
copy to a metal printing surface, the derm- 
aprint from a positive photographic copy to 
a mimeograph stencil surface. 

There are also four techniques for 
making books in typescript face. Among 
them the leading place belongs to photo- 
offset, but room must also be found for the 
mimeograph, hectograph, and even the hum- 
ble carbon paper. These techniques will be 
discussed in a later chapter. This pres-— 
enhuanalysius. is imitted to the discussion 
of making books in ordinary print type from 





one of two kinds of copy--a manuscript that 
is being converted into a new book, and an 
old book that is being reprinted. 


Printing with Raised Type on Cylinder Press= 
es. 





From the time of John Gutenberg un- 
til that of Ottmar Mergenthaler, the proc- 
ess of printing remained fundamentally the 
same. Separate types, laboriously set up 
by hand, were used to make impressions 
upon paper or other substances. With the 
invention of the typesetting and typecast- 
siales WieKelalainaleys; alia, late) iaimvalerneisiniclal Cxevanicibney 
however, a revolution in printing methods 
was effected. 

The most common typesetting 
chines, remarkable in their ingenious 
mechanism, are the linotype, invented by 
Mergenthaler, and the intertype, built upon 
the mechanical principles devised by him. 
These machines, which produce the greater 
Percentage: OL TCOMmposs FLO n Lie Olsen e Ouimistaya 
assemble matrices containing the faces of 
ethers invincagi lors te tice sacle mOmec mmoles 
in which is cast the complete line in one 
piece or slug, with the type on the upper 
edge, properly spaced and justified. The 
Ludlow Typograph, another slug-casting ma- 
chine, is used chiefly for display work. 
The monotype, invented by Tolbert Lanston, 
casts individual types in the correct order 
and automatically transfers them to a gal- 
ley in justified lines. 

The type as cast by the compositor 
is arranged in long columns. These must 
be proofread and "made-up," that is to say, 
divided into pages and arranged in forms 
in such a-way that the printed sheet, when 
folded, will page correctly. 

The printing is then done on a 
flat-bed cylinder press. The type as laid 
on the flat surface, with its thousands of 
slugs and individual types, does not pre- 
sent-a true surface, It is, therenoce, 
necessary to prepare the surface of the 
printing machine cylinder (called the tym- 
pan sheet) so that even pressure is given 
On every pare on the Gype.. sls moperaialorae 
Witchy is Taymos Gg. Vaborloms ektmhed icin meron 
scientiously done, is called "make-ready." 
Without careful make-ready, satisfactory 


ma— 


1. Planographing (which includes hectographing), photolithography, lithoprinting, offset printing, "copi- 
fyer" process, rotaprinting, offset lithography, repro-printing, photocopying, photoprinting, poly- 


printing, planoprinting, and multilithing. 











Velie? Sik ess 9 P 
mM NO ¥Xj0%h: A 
; 


ae) ' 
RE Pe Lye 


rs - . 7 
rs ' 
oe salon, on « ay ae 1 





FIGURE I 


This figure, showing a page of 10—point Century and a page of 10-point Granjon, 
both leaded two points, gives a comparison of the varying word content made pos- 


sible by the use of different type faces of the same point size. 


These pages 


were reproduced from tne Wolff Type Book with the kind permission of the Wolff 


Book Manufacturing Company. 


10 POINT CENTURY 


THE "RED DEATH" had long devastated the country. 
No pestilence had ever been so fatal, or so hideous. 
Blood was it Avatar and its seal—the redness and 
the horror of blood. There were sharp pains, and sud- 
den dizziness, and then profuse bleeding at the pores, 
with dissolution. The scarlet stains upon the body 
and especially upon the face of the victim, were the 
pest ban which shut him out from the aid and from 
the sympathy of his fellow-men. And the whole seiz- 
ure, progress and termination of the disease, were 
the incidents of half an hour. But the Prince Pros- 
pero was happy and dauntless and sagacious. When 
his dominions were half depopulated, he summoned 
to his presence a thousand hale and light-hearted 
friends from among the knights and dames of his 
court, and with these retired to the deep seclusion of 
one of his castellated abbeys. This was an extensive 
and magnificent structure, the creation of the 
prince's own eccentric yet august taste. A strong and 
lofty wall girdled it in. This wall had gates of iron. 
The courtiers, having entered, brought furnaces and 
massy hammers and welded the bolts. They resolved 
to leave means neither of ingress nor egress to the 
sudden impulses of despair or of frenzy from within. 
The abbey was amply provisioned. With such pre- 
cautions the courtiers might bid defiance to conta- 
gion. The external world could take care of itself. In 
the mean time it was folly to grieve, or to think. The 
prince had provided all the appliances of pleasure. 
There were buffoons, there were improvisatori, there 
were ballet-dancers, there were musicians, there was 
Beauty, there was wine. All these and security were 
within. Without was the "Red Death." It was toward 


291 WORDS 33 LINES 2 POINT LEAD 


10 POINT GRANJON 


Tue "Rep Deatu" had long devastated the country. No pesti- 
lence had ever been so fatal, or so hideous. Blood was its Ava- 
tar and its seal—the redness and the horror of blood. There 
were sharp pains, and sudden dizziness, and then profuse 
bleeding at the pores, with dissolution. The scarlet stains upon 
the body and especially upon the face of the victim, were the 
pest ban which shut him out from the aid and from the sym- 
pathy of his fellow-men. And the whole seizure, progress and 
termination of the disease, were the incidents of half an hour. 
But the Prince Prospero was happy and dauntless and saga- 
cious. When his dominions were half depopulated, he sum- 
moned to his presence a thousand hale and light-hearted friends 
from among the knights and dames of his court, and with 
these retired to the deep seclusion of one of his castellated 
abbeys. This was an extensive and magnificent structure, the 
creation of the prince's own eccentric yet august taste. A strong 
and lofty wall girdled it in. This wall had gates of iron. The 
courtiers, having entered, brought furnaces and massy ham- 
mers and welded the bolts. They resolved to leave means 
neither of ingress nor egress to the sudden impulses of despair 
or of frenzy from within. The abbey was amply provisioned. 
With such precautions the courtiers might bid defiance to con- 
tagion. The external world could take care of itself. In the 
mean time it was folly to grieve, or to think. The prince had 
provided all the appliances of pleasure. There were buffoons, 
there were improvisatori, there were ballet-dancers, there were 
musicians, there was Beauty, there was wine. All these and 
security were within. Without was the "Red Death." It was 
toward the close of the fifth or sixth month of his seclusion, 
and while the pestilence raged most furiously abroad, that 
the Prince Prospero entertained his thousand friends at a 
masked ball of the most unusual magnificence. It was a volup- 
tuous scene, that masquerade. But first let me tell of the rooms 
342 WORDS 


33 LINES 2 POINT LEAD 





Sample Page to Illustrate Letterpress Format on 634"x914" Page 


AN ECONOMICAL PRINT-FACE FORMAT 


In order to secure an economical print-face format, various factors must be 
taken into consideration. Among these are the compactness and size of the 
type-face, the amount of leading, and the width of the margins. 

In discussing type-sizes and type-faces, it may be well to know of the grad- 
uated or uniform scale for measuring type which is now used by American 
type-founders. This scale is known as the point system. The unit of the sys- 
tem is a division of space called a point, which is .013837 or Ye of an inch. 
All type sizes are multiples of this unit of measurement. The smallest type 
generally used is 5-point or Pearl. 6-point or Nonpareil and 8-point or Bre- 
vier are frequently used for footnotes in monographic work. 7-point or 
Minion is commonly used for newsprint. 1o-point or Long Primer is best 
suited for regular book composition. Examples of these type-sizes can con- 
veniently be found by looking under "type" in Webster's International Dic- 
tionary of the English Language. The use of a type-size smaller than 10-point 
effects an economy in make-up and make-ready but not in composition, for 
a given manuscript will require approximately the same number of "ems" 
in various sizes of type. 

As a given font of type has an exact point-size in its depth, so the individual 
characters of that font have a definite width of "set." The average width of 
the character "m" in a type-face is as great as its depth; in a word, the letter 
"m" is exactly square. This is the case in commonly used type-faces like Cas- 
lon Old Style, Scotch Roman and Modern, where in 10-point the set size of 
the letter "m" is also 10 points. In a compact type-face, like the one used for 
this composition, the set size of the letter "m" is only 94 points, with all other 
characters having a corresponding compactness. By the use of this type-face, 
known as Granjon, a considerable saving can be effected in composition costs 
if these are reckoned up by multiplying the width by che length of the line. 
If composition costs are determined by the number of key-strokes instead of 
the amount of type matter, this type-face would effect a saving not in com- 
position costs, but in area costs only. 

Excessive leading is not compatible with good value in book-making, and 
should be prevented, if possible, by instructions by the publisher to the printer. 
The type of this page is leaded one point; in a word, 11-point type is cast 
on a 12-point body. 

Much space is often wasted in margins. The formula for margins given by 
Gress' calls for top and back margin to be equal; the outside to be equal 
to the top plus one-third of the back margin; and the bottom to be equal to 
the outside margin plus two picas (or about one-fourth inch). This formula 
is followed in the format here illustrated. 

This page format has been designed by the R. R. Donnelley & Sons Com- 
pany of Chicago as one taking account of the economies possible in page 
IW. B. Gress, Advanced Typography (Washington, 1931), p. 125. 


FIGURE II 


mt TEPty pe vi? - ; Dy 7 
sae ' : , ' p 4. . Terres ; 
7 A i ¥ . y Vive hare i : - 
L : Te pee oigte A AD pt 
¥ ee } 
ire m7 it ee: i b 





Ferenc seu easep es art cage tgp lavas Siem epensse te A Sa Gs a ts foros str gs eos rns ae ese es nS a oS SES at tS CS SoS sw ov ele mn ee Os wea we Fw me Sh So oe Sew mw as Ot os ec ny rod ne Oe el a a ce ae ate Fw Sw Sat wn Sm ln nmr ea 


T 
1 
1 
' 
' 
1 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
' 
' 
1 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
1 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
1 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
1 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 
1 
1 
1 
' 
1 
1 
1 
' 
' 
' 
' 
t 
' 
' 
' 
' 
' 
1 


Sample Page to Illustrate Letterpress Format on 634"x91/9" Page 


AN ECONOMICAL PRINT-FACE FORMAT 


A two-column page is economical because 
it permits a fuller utilization of the page size. 
The width of the margins can be decreased 
without loss of proportion, while the size of 
type can be reduced without serious loss of 
legibility. Thus the word content of a page 
can be very materially increased. 

In constructing a two-column page format, 
the relationship between the line length and 
the type-size as a factor affecting legibility is 
an important consideration. The most signif- 
icant work in establishing this relationship 
has been done by M. A. Tinker and D. G. 
Paterson at the University of Minnesota. In a 
series of articles in the Journal of Applied Psy- 
chology their experimental investigations are 
described. In the April 1929 issue on pages 
120-130 is found a report in regard to the 
"Size of Type." After experimenting with 
6, 8, 10, 12, and 14 points of type, Paterson 
and Tinker concluded that "10 point type 
yields the fastest reading and is thus the opti- 
mum size of type for efficient reading." They 
also pointed out, in the course of their discus- 
sion, that "one is seldom justified in reducing 
printing space to such a degree that speed of 
reading is markedly decreased." In the June 
1929 issue on pages 205-19 Paterson and 
Tinker report on the "Length of Line." 
After investigating texts in 10-point type in 
59, 80, 97, 114, 136, 152,168, and 186 mm. 
line lengths, they believe the conclusion is 
justified that "for 10 point type, an 80 mm. 
(or 19 pica) line yields the fastest reading 
and is therefore the optimum length of line 
for efficient reading." In the February 1931 
issue on pages 72-78, Tinker and Paterson 
report on the "Simultaneous Variation of 
Type and Line Length." They investigated 
the legibility of 6, 8, 10, 12, and 14 point 
types set in line lengths, proportionally in- 
creased or decreased from 10-point on 19 
picas. Thus 6-point was set in a 16 pica, 8- 
point in a 17 pica, 10-point in a 19 pica, 12- 
point in a 23 pica, and 14-point in a 27 pica 
line. Their conclusions are the following: 

The results obtained in this experiment seem to 


justify the conclusion that line for line arrangements 
varying from a standard text printed in 10 point with 


an optimal line length of 19 picas yield equally efh- 
cient reading performance for 8 and 10 point type, 
and possibly for larger sizes. The evidence shows that 
6 point type with line length reduced as stated is 
read at a significantly slower rate. 

The experiment yields evidence that, within cer- 
tain limits, neither size of type nor line length as 
single variables can be relied upon in determining 
optimal typographical arrangements. Both factors 
(and perhaps others as well) work hand in hand 
and must be properly balanced to produce a printed 
page which will promote the maximum reading rate. 

The typescript pages of this book are ar- 
ranged in a two-column format with a line 
length approximating the optimal line length 
for 10-point type. Since it is difficult to find 
the typescript equivalent of 10-point type, it 
is not possible to determine whether the type- 
script size used in this book will yield the 
tastest reading, but it is likely that it ap- 
proaches the optimum size of type for effi- 
cient reading. 

This double-column format in print-face 
has a printing surface of 5% x 7% inches, 
with line lengths of 15 picas. The type-size 
used is 10-point for the regular composition 
and 8-point for the two paragraphs of quo- 
tation. The type-face is Granjon. It has been 
possible to prepare this page through the 
courtesy of the R. R. Donnelley & Sons Com- 
pany of Chicago. 

A two-coluinn page is economical because 
it permits a fuller utilization of the page size. 
The width of the margins can be decreased 
without loss of proportion, while the size of 
type can be reduced without serious loss of 
legibility. Thus the word content of a page 
can be very materially increased. 

In constructing a two-column page format, 
the relationship between the line length and 
the type-size as a factor affecting legibility 
is an important consideration. The most sig- 
nificant work in establishing this relationship 
has been done by M. A. Tinker and D. G. 
Paterson at the University. of Minnesota. In 
a series of articles in the Journal of Applied 
Psycho'ogy their experimental investigations 
are described. In the April 1929 issue on 
pages 120-130 is found a report in regard to 
the "Size of Type." After experimenting with 
6, 8, 10, 12, and 14 points of type, Paterson 


PUGUBRE SE 


PRINTED BOOKS AND REPRINTS aS 


results are unobtainable. 


Printing: Composition Costs 


In printing from raised type on 
flat-bed cylinder presses, composition 
costs form a major item of expense in the 
manufacture of a book. To be sure, the 
composing machines, by increasing the speed 
and accuracy of composition, have reduced 
its cost, so that hand-set type, when used 
in straight textual matter, has become a 
luxury. But the elaborate mechanism neces— 
sary for casting type makes the cost of 
the machines so high (from $4000 to $8000) 
that a heavy overhead charge is necessary. 
The all-inclusive cost per chargeable hour 
for the operation of the machines range 
from $3.00 to $5.00. The composite aver- 
age for print shops in the United States in 
1932 was $3.927, according to the United 
Typothetae of America. The composite for 
monotype keyboard operation was $3.466, and 
for the monotype caster $2.858. These fig- 
ures include all factory expenses, commer- 
cial and selling expenses, overhead, and 
the wages of skilled compositors, which 
Porme45% sof the total. In estimating 
cost of composition, a standard unit of 
TeOCRemseis used; thatois, the amount: of 
text that will occupy the lineage of a 
thousand of the letter m, or, to be more 
accurate, the square of any particular type 
size. If the number of ems per word is 
calculated at four, there would be 250 
words per 1000 ems. Since a compositor 
will set from 3000 to 5000 ems per hour, 
the cost of machine composition, reckoning 
on the basis of $3.00 to $5.00 per machine 
hour, would run between $2.40 and $6.65 per 
1000 words. 

Theoretically, the amount of compo- 
sition is determined by multiplying the 
number of ems in one line by the number of 
lines set. It is the general trade prac-— 
tice, however, in measuring up type for the 
purpose of finding the cost of composition, 
to include headings, leads, slugs, etc., as 
composed lines.® Thus the number of ems in 
'the page is found by multiplying the width 
by the length of the line. The author, 


the 


therefore, pays in composition for exces-— 
sive leading. 
in 10-point type on ll-point body, 


The majority of books appear 
the 





majority of newspapers in 6 1/2-point or 
7-point type on 7-point body. For each ad- 
ditional point of leading the author ordi- 
narily pays about 10% more in composition. 
It is questionable whether legibility de- 
mands more than one point of lead between 
lines. Certainly types like Caslon Old 
Style, with its long descenders, can be 
sparsely leaded without suffering in legi- 
oat elisingts yas 

Composition costs can be controlled 
in some measure by using a compact type 
face. Most of the commonly used type faces, 
like Caslon Old Style, Scotch Roman and Mod- 
ern, have a set corresponding to the face 
Size, ulabeils, an em ol these type faces is 
square; others, like Binny Old Style and 
Century Expanded, are used at a slightly 
wader seu; whiikevothers, slike Bruce Old 
Style, Kennerley, Garamond, and Granjon, are 
cast on a Slightly narrower set. Thus a 
page of a certain number of ems of Granjon 
would contain 7% to 10% more words than a 
corresponding page with the same number of 
ems of Century Expanded, as is obvious by 
comparing the word content of Figure I. 
Two economical print-face formats are shown 
in hieures il and int 

The difference in words per 1000 
ems between a compact and expanded type 
face, plus the difference between minimal 


'and excessive leading, may make an appre- 


Ciable difference in composition costs for 
a book of a few hundred pages, perhaps as 
much as 10% or 20%. 

Most of the printing done in Amer- 
ica is newsprinting. The American public 
reads more words in newsprint than in any 
other form. The publication of scholarly 
books, if estimated in number of ems, or 
area of pages, or tonnage of paper and size 
of edition, is almost negligible in compar- 
ison with the corresponding newsprint fig- 
ures. Yet books, in general, are printed 
in larger type than newspapers, and with a 
layout that devotes a much larger propor- 
tion of the page area to margins. News-— 
print in two-inch columns, as standardized 
in the American press, is certainly a for— 
mat of remarkable cheapness and efficiency. 

As a factor increasing composition 
costs, corrections and alterations deserve 
particular attention. From a description 





e. Some firms, like R. R. Donnelley and Sons Company, have adopted the scientific method of measuring 
composition by computing the actual number of ems set. 


16 _ METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





of the typesetting machines, especially the 
linotype and intertype, it is obvious that 
making corrections in the matter already 
set up is a costly operation, because each 
error requires the substitution of an en- 
tire line. With the monotype, corrections 
are somewhat cheaper, for only a single 
letter, already cast, need be substituted. 

After composition has been made to 
correspond to the copy, all changes subse- 
quently made by the author or his publish- 
er, whether in the text or in the arrange— 
ment of paragraphs, are considered as 
author's alterations and are charged 
against him. Not infrequently the author 
is presented with a bill for his altera- 
tions almost equaling that of the original 
composition costs. Author's alterations 
are usually charged on the basis of time 
at the rate of about $2.00 to $4.00 per 
hour, varying with the wage scale, and 
higher when made by machine than when made 
by hand. In some cases alterations are 
billed on a unit basis with standard unit 
prices for changes, which enable the cus- 
DONC re OncIeckw his pit in Some caseccma 
free allowance, possibly 10% above the 
original composition, is made by the print- 
er for author's alterations, whicn means 
simply that this factor has been figured 
into the original bid. 

Author's corrections would be en- 
tirely unnecessary if the author would de- 
vote the same attention to the preparation 
of copy as he would to making a master copy 
for photo-offset, and be equally satisfied 
to accept this as a final form. By delib- 
erately preparing a manuscript which would 
FT UStel Le IIS LRG GLO stom Od LowmMcop yin! 
the author would contribute to a low cost 
level in ordinary printing in the same way, 
though in a less degree, as by taking upon 
himself the making of the master copy for 
the photo-offset process. Some editors af- 
firm that authors are so given to habits of 
carelessness that reform in this respect is 
possible only by changing human nature. 


Princes enna WCOStS 

As inv the case of composition costs; 
Hitomi tn culG hor sae author etoncon troll 
akeaeeCOStS Ui raLseds type pirimbimae. Area 
costs consist of make-up and make-ready. 
These operations increase in cost with the 
number of pages, but also greatly increase 
wnenever it is necessary to fit type around 








pictorial or non-textual matter during 
make-up, or whenever the tympan sheet on 
the press must be prepared for pictorial 
matter during make-ready. 

The fundamental unit of all area 
costs in raised type printing is the form 
or Signature. The form is the area of 
type that fills the bed of the press, and 
is imposed upon the paper in one printing 
operation. The signature is the sheet of 
paper, prinved sons both sides = whkiechmss 
folded into a definite number of pages-—- 
usually sixteen or thirty-two. The area 
costs of printing mount form by form and 
Signature by signature. It is wasteful of 
area GO Utilize only aQporulonsOisaa norm 
or to leave part of a signature unprinted. 
Printing economy always requires that there 
be such ancalculationvon typestace jy mmbyoe 
size, and leading that the text comes out 
even with the forms and signatures. Just 
as ems, not words, are the main cost units 
in composition, so forms and signatures, 
not pages, are the determining quantities 
hi ace ACOs uss 

The amount of space a manuscript 
will occupy can be calculated either by 
counting the number of wordssinv a sunt i 
cient number of lines and then multiplying 
by the number of lines, or by figuring the 
number of letters or words to the square 
inch. The average typewriter, with pica 
type, writes sixty letters single-spaced 
and thirty letters double-spaced; and with 
elite type writes seventy-two letters sin- 
gle-spaced and thirty-six letters double- 
spaced to the square inch. The average 
print-face type, on the other hand, has 
approximately the following number of let- 
ters to the square inch: 


Size of Type solid Leaded 
6-point 204 ES 
8-point 153 alan 

1O-point 98 84 
12-point ie 60 


The average print-face type, moreover, has 
approximately the following number of words 
to the square inch: 


Size of Type solid Leadea 
6-point 47 54 
8-point 3 25 

10-point ea 16 


12-point 14 ale 





FIGURE IV 


This figure, showing a page of 8-point Bodoni and a page of 10-point Bodoni type, 
both leaded one point, gives a comparison of the varying word content made possi- 
ble by the use of different size type in the same face. These pages were repro-— 
duced from the Wolff Type Book with the kind permission of the Wolff Book Manu- 


facturing Company. 


10-POINT BODONI 


THE "Rep DEATH" had long devastated the country. No 
pestilence had ever been so fatal, or so hideous. Blood 
was its Avatar and its seal—the redness and the horror 
of blood. There were sharp pains, and sudden dizziness, 
and then profuse bleeding at the pores, with dissolution. 
The scarlet stains upon the body and especially upon the 
face of the victim, were the pest ban which shut him out 
from the aid and from the sympathy of his fellow-men. 
And the whole seizure, progress and termination of the 
disease, were the incidents of half an hour. But the 
Prince Prospero was happy and dauntless and sagacious. 
When his dominions were half depopulated, he sum- 
moned to his presence a thousand hale and light-hearted 
friends from among the knights and dames of his court, 
and with these retired to the deep seclusion of one of his 
castellated abbeys. This was an extensive and magnifi- 
cent structure, the creation of the prince's own eccentric 
yet august taste. A strong and lofty wall girdled it in. 
This wall had gates of iron. The courtiers, having en- 
tered, brought furnaces and massy hammers and welded 
the bolts. They resolved to leave means neither of in- 
gress nor egress to the sudden impulses of despair or of 
frenzy from within. The abbey was amply provisioned. 
With such precautions the courtiers might bid defiance 
to contagion. The external world could take care of 
itself. In the mean time it was folly to grieve, or to 
think. The prince had provided all the appliances of 
pleasure. There were buffoons, there were improvisatori, 
there were ballet-dancers, there were musicians, there 
was Beauty, there was wine. All these and security were 
within. Without was the "Red Death." It was toward 
the close of the fifth or sixth month of his seclusion, 
and while the pestilence raged most furiously abroad, 
that the Prince Prospero entertained his thousand 
friends at a masked ball of the most unusual magnifi- 
cence. It was a voluptuous scene, that masquerade. But 


335 WORDS 36 LINES 1 POINT LEAD 


8-POINT BODONI 


Tue "Rep DeatH" had long devastated the councry. I'o pestilence 
had ever been so fatal, or so hideous. Blood was its Avatar and 
its seal—the redness and the horror of blood. There were sharp 
pains, and sudden dizziness, and then profuse bleeding at the 
pores, with dissolution. The scarlet stains upon the body and espe- 
cially upon the facé of the victim, were the pest ban which shut 
him out from the aid and from the sympathy of his fellow-men. 
And the whole seizure, progress and termination of the disease, 
were the incidents of half an hour. But the Prince Prospero was 
happy and dauntless and sagacious. When his dominions were 
half depopulated, he summoned to his presence a thousand hale 
and light-hearted friends from among the knights and dames of 
his court, and with these retired to the deep seclusion of one 
of his castellated abbeys. This was an extensive and magnificent 
structure, the creation of the prince's own eccentric yet august 
taste. A strong and lofty wall girdled it in. This wall had gates 
of iron. The courtiers, having entered, brought furnaces and massy 
hammers and welded the bolts. They resolved to leave means 
neither of ingress nor egress to the sudden impulses of despair 
or of frenzy from within. The abbey was amply provisioned. 
With such precautions the courtiers might bid defiance to con- 
tagion. The external world could take care of itself. In the mean 
time it was folly to grieve, or to think. The prince had provided 
all the appliances of pleasure. There were buffoons, there were 
improvisatori, there were ballet-dancers, there were musicians, 
there was Beauty, there was wine. All these and security were 
within. Without was the "Red Death." It was toward the close 
of the fifth or sixth month of his seclusion, and while the pesti- 
lence raged most furiously abroad, that the Prince Prospero en- 
tertained his thousand friends at a masked ball of the most un- 
usual magnificence. It was a voluptuous scene, that masquerade. 
But first let me tell of the rooms in which it was held. There 
were seven—an imperial suite. In many palaces, however, such 
suites form a long and straight vista, while the folding-doors 
slide back nearly to the walls on either hand, so that the view 
of the whole extent is scarcely impeded. Here the case was very 
different; as might have been expected from the prince's love of 
the bizarre. The apartments were so irregularly disposed that the 
vision embraced but little more than one at a time. There was a 
sharp turn at every twenty or thirty yards, and at each turn a 
novel effect. To the right and left, in the middle of each wall, a 
tall and narrow Gothic window looked out upon a closed cor- 
ridor which pursued the windings of the suite. These windows 
were of stained glass whose colour varied in accordance with 


485 WORDS 44 LINES 1 POINT LEAD 
ERRATA 


Page 17, first column, twelfth line from the 
bottom which now reads ",..would yield 800 
pages, £4,600 words", should read, "...would 
yield 800 words per page, 24,600 words...." 


PRINTED BOOKS AND REPRINTS al 





The number of pages, and hence the number 
of forms, required will vary with the point 
size of the type, the compactness of the 
type, and the amount of leading. 

An important difference is to be 
noted in the effect upon costs of faces 
and compactness of type on the one hand, 
eau poLnt, size onthe other. True it is 
that resort to compact type faces and light 
leading will mean fewer pages and hence 
fewer forms than extended faces and heavy 
leading. But the greatest difference in 
area costs is a resultant-of two other fac-— 
tors--the proportion of paper given to text 
as compared with the proportion given: to 
margins, and the point size of type. These 
elements of cost, more than any others, are 
likely to be related most directly to the 
Dean yma nom Leg tba ln ty O fe rexu. 

According to Vernon, ® ine Vom eso) 
great variation in legibility between 6- 
point type and 10-point type. Readers and 
reviewers, however, often express prefer- 
ence for the larger type sizes, and their 
preferences, even if they be regarded as 
the results of habit rather than the con- 
sequences of the physiology of vision, must 
be taken into account by a publisher. How 
far it is wise to let considerations of 
economy in area costs bring about the use 
of the smaller type sizes must be calcu- 
lated by comparing two quantities: namely, 
the percentage of cost saving that can be 
effected by shifting from the largest to 
the smallest type, and the sacrifice of 
legibility or beauty that results from such 
CMe Stiietntie 

How rapidly will area costs fall if 
type size is reduced? Consider a 6" x Qn" 
page, with a printing surface 4 1/2" 

x 7 1/2", printed with 32-page forms. News- 
print in two columns with half an inch be- 
tween them would yield 800 pages, 24,600 
words per form (according to an actual 
count of words). Eight-point type, leaded 
one point would put 25,000 words on a form; 
1O0-point type in the same type face, lead- 
ed one point, would put 17,500 words on a 
form. Figure IV shows the increase in word 


content per page that is made possible by 
shifting from 10-point Bodoni type to 8- 
point Bodoni, both being leaded one point. 
The shift from 10-point to 8-point type 
one- 


would save one form out of three, or 











third of the area cost in a text of 50,000 
words, 


Printings Running Costs 


Running costs are not decisive in 
small editions. The difference between 
THCmCOStmOLmD mM bh nee OmandmOONCOplesuaS 
so small that firms often quote the same 
DiC Ce nO Or ibe SE NUSmOOS Sl DLC mL 
have an overprint, which can be left in 
Sheets until needed, at a very slight ad- 
ditional cost. Even with books of larger 
editions this procedure is followed. The 
Encyclopedia Britannica, for example, is 
Drie beduan tots sof 15.000, but is) bound in 
lots of 2500 only. Electrotypes are made 
which are preserved for further printing, 
and the type is kept standing for making 
corrections and for making new electro- 
types. 





As the size of the edition increases 
to the point where composition and make- 
ready costs begin to be balanced by the 
cost of materials and running time in the 
press, the established conceptions covering 
book costs become operative. Many of the 
great inventions in the printing world 
since the Linotype have been devices of one 
kind or another for getting the printing 
surface on a cylinder and off the flat-bed, 
so that faster running and longer runs 
would be possible. This is the story of 
the stereotype,.cast from a matrix, and of 
the electrotype, resulting from coating an 
impression in wax electrolytically with 
copper. But they have no place in the cal- 
culations of costs of small editions. 


Printings) Analysis of Costs 


In analyzing the composition, the 
Brea wold Lhe eruUnnIine COS ts soreproducing 
a book by straight printing, one might 
take the cost behavior in Chicago as an ex-— 
ample. A book of 50,000 words in an edi- 
tion Of 750, on 1238 6" x 9" pages, could be 
made for $246.57. . Taking these figures as 
an illustrative sample, it appears that for 
composing and printing a book, about 50% 
Of the icostegoes for composition, about 
32% for make-up, 12% for make-ready, and 
6% for actual printing in a minimum edition. 
There is, however, great dissimilarity in 
the amount which the different departments 
contribute to the cost of the finished 
product in various shops of the countr 





5. M. D. Vernon, Experimental Study of Reading, (Cambridge, Massachusetts, 1931). 





18 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 








For hour costs of composing 50,000 words at a composite rate of 
$3.55 per hour for Chicago printers, without allowance for 


profi, the fopeal "weld shay... - Gi2'7 0 


For hour costs of printing 250 impressions, the time allowed per 
form being .65 ours: according to Hoch, # Ow 2) Owed Or Bose 
hours, at a composite rate of $4.90 per hour for flat-—bed cyl- 
inder presses for Chicago printers, without allowance for prof- 


it, the total would be aSreae 


eeeee eoseeeee eee ec oe ew © Oo oO eeeee 


For wages at the prevailing rate of $1.225 per hour in 1922 for 
make-up and lock-up, the time required for eight 16-page forms 


being 64 hours, the total wage bill would be... 78.40 


For wages at the prevailing rate of $1.225 per hour in 1934 for 

make-ready, the time required for a book of 128 pages, for 

which eight forms of 16 pages would be necessary, a deduction 

of .5 hours from the first make-ready time of 3.5 hours being 

allowed for the seven repetitive forms, the time required being 

ee hours, the total wage bill would be Ome 
$246.57 
can be expected to drift to the 
areas. 


in general, the wages paid to low-wage 


skilled labor for composition work and for 
make-up and make-ready must account for a 
large part of the printer's bill. The av- 
erages of the United Typothetae of America 
show that wages account for approximately 
45% of the cost of printing. Wages con- 
stantly increase in proportion to the to- 
ValNCOsiu On produchLOneasm tle Sl ZenOme tine 
edition decreases. The printing and pub- 
lishing business, which is under the same 
pressure as other industries toward decen- 
tralization away from the big cities, can 
be expected to decentralize most rapidly 
its small-edition publishing. There is 
now setting in a contrary pressure toward 
the standardization of wages, but unless 
the regional and urban-rural differentials 
are closed up, small-edition publishing 








The Multigraph Process 
In multigraphing, the scholar en-— 

COUN TELS) Lies CLUInHOUGe Siu Ucn lOnuncmcbmnymlac 

he is trying to find an economical means of 

making small runs that will look like print- 

ing rather than typescript, the business 

man is trying to make large runs that will 

look like typescript rather than print. The 

multigraph (Figure V) is a small rotary 

printing machine designed for office use 

and employed chiefly for printing form let-— 

ters and circulars of one or more pages in 

imitation Of typescript and for making or= 

fice forms from print-face type in imita-— 

tion of printing.° : 

The best adaptation of 





multigraph 





4, Fred Hoch, Standard Book of Estimating for Printers (Chicago, 1929) issued by the United Typothetae 





of America. 


. Loose type, milled linotype slugs, special monotype composition, automatically embossed aluminum type 


strips or curved plates or electrotypes are mounted on the printing cylinder by sliding them into 
fixed grooves. Loose type, which is the most commonly used, is set semi-automatically by hand or with 
a typesetting machine operated with typewriter control. As in the case of typewriting, the right-hand 
margins come out uneven, unless they are justified by hand or with special adjustable spacers. The 
type is obtainable in a wide variety of sizes and standard print-faces, and costs $.80 for typewriter 
styles, 6.95 for print styles, for a box containing on an average 25,000 characters, printing about 
415 words; it is scrapped after using. It is sometimes mounted on a flexible blanket which may easily 
be attached to or removed from a smooth-faced segment. The embossed strips are always mounted on a 
similar sort of blanket. The most popular multigraph prints only one 8 1/2" x 11" page at a time, but 
a machine is manufactured with a drum large enough for two 8 1/2" x 11" pages; this is fairly common. 





FIGURE V 


Model 100 Multigraph 





AN ECONOMICAL MIMEOFORM FORMAT 
(Paper size 6 x 9 inches) 
(12 pt. type) 


The Multigraph, employed chiefly for printing 
form letters, becomes a factor in the field of repro- 
duction, when used in combination with type-setting 
machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of reproduction 
has been made by Mimeoform Press, 1320 F Street, 
N. W., Washington, D. C., under the direction of 
Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who styles his process the Mimeo- 
form Process. Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston mono- 
type for setting type, with a special take off, which 
delivers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph drum in 
page form, doing away with galley proof. Proof 
reading done, corrections are quickly made away 
from caster. Type-setting is combined with make- 
up, and running costs, in small editions, are smaller 
than the cost of making signatures for the flat-bed 
press; the Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the 
cheapest method of presenting textual matter in 
print-face type, in editions up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process demands 
spacing of six lines to the inch regardless of 
type size (8, 10, and 12 point). Illustrations, even 
half tones can be combined with text at no greater 
cost than for printing, if curved plates are provided. 
The most economical Mimeoform format is an 8- 
1/2" by 11" page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for printing 
form letters, becomes a factor in the field of repro- 
duction, when used in combination with type-setting 
machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of reproduction 
has been made by Mimeoform Press, 1320 F Street, 
N. W., Washington, D. C., under the direction of 
Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who styles his process the Mimeo- 
form Process. Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston mono- 
type for setting type, with a special take off, which 
delivers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph drum. 


AN ECONOMICAL MIMEOFORM FORMAT 
(Paper size 6 x 9 inches) 


(8 pt. type) 


The Multigraph, employed chiefly for printing form letters, becomes 
a factor in the field of reproduction, when used in combination with type- 
setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of reproduction has been made by 
Mimeoform Press, 1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., under the 
direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who styles his process the Mimeoform 
Process. Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston monotype for setting type, with a 
special take off, which delivers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph drum in page form, doing 
away with galley proof. Proof reading done, corrections are quickly 
made away from caster. Type-setting is combined with makeup, and 
running costs, in small editions, are smaller than the cost of making signa- 
tures for the flat-bed press; the Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the 
cheapest method of presenting textual matter in print-face type, in 
editions up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process demands spacing of six lines to 
the inch regardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 point). TIlustrations, 
even half tones, can be combined with text at no greater cost than for 
printing, if curved plates are provided. The most economical Mimeo- 
form format is an 8-1/2' by 11" page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for printing form letters, becomes 
a factor in the field of reproduction, when used in combination with type- 
setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of reproduction has been made by 
Mimeoform Press, 1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., under the 
direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who styles his process the Mimeoform 
Process. Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston monotype for setting type, with a 
special take off, which delivers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph drum in page form, doing 
away with galley proof. Proof reading done, corrections are quickly made 
away from caster. Type-setting is combined with makeup, and running 
costs, in small editions, are smaller than the cost of making signatures for 
the flat-bed press; the Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the cheapest 
method of presenting textual matter in print-face type, in editions up to 
five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process demands spacing of six lines to 
the inch regardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 point). Illustrations, 
even half tones, can be combined with text at no greater cost than for 
printing, if curved plates are provided. 


AN ECONOMICAL MIMEOFORM FORMAT 
(Paper size 8-1/2 by 11 inches) 


The Multigraph, employed chiefly for 
printing form letters, becomes a factor in the 
field of reproduction, when used in combina- 
tion with type-setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of repro- 
duction has been made by Mimeoform Press, 
1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., un- 
der the direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who 
styles his process the Mimeoform Process. 
Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston monotype for set- 
ting type, with a special take off, which deliv- 
ers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph 
drum in page form, doing away with galley 
proof. Proof reading done, corrections are 
quickly made away from caster. Type-setting 
is combined with makeup, and running costs, 
in small editions, are smaller than the cost of 
making signatures for the flat-bed press; the 
Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the cheapest 
method of presenting textual matter in print- 
face type, in editions up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process de- 
mands spacing of six lines to the inch re- 
gardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 point). 
Illustrations, even half tones, can be combined 
with text at no greater cost than for printing, 
if curved plates are provided. The most eco- 
nomical Mimeoform format is an 8-1/2" by 11" 
page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for 
printing form letters, becomes a factor in the 
field of reproduction, when used in combina- 
tion with type-setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of repro- 
duction has been made by Mimeoform Press, 
1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., un- 
der the direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who 
styles his process the Mimeoform Process. 
Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston monotype for set- 
ting type, with a special take off, which deliv- 
ers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph 
drum in page form, doing away with galley 
proof. Proof reading done, corrections are 
quickly made away from caster. Type-setting 
is combined with makeup, and running costs, 
in small editions, are smaller than the cost of 
making signatures for the flat-bed press; the 


Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the cheapest 
method of presenting textual matter in print- 
face type, in editions up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process de- 
mands spacing of six lines to the inch re- 
gardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 point). 
Illustrations, even half tones, can be combined 
with text at no greater cost than for printing, 
if curved plates are provided. The most eco- 
nomical Mimeoform format is an 8-1/2" by 11" 
page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for 
printing form letters, becomes a factor in the 
field of reproduction, when used in combina- 
tion with type-setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of repro- 
duction has been made by Mimeoform Press, 
1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., un- 
der the direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who 
styles his process the Mimeoform Process. 
Mr. Kletsch uses a Lanston monotype for set- 
ting type, with a special take off, which deliv- 
ers the line of short type, properly spaced and 
justified, to the channels of the multigraph 
drum in page form, doing away with galley 
proof. Proof reading done, corrections are 
quickly made away from caster, Type-setting 
is combined with makeup, and running costs, 
in small editions, are smaller than the cost of 
making signatures for the flat-bed press; the 
Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the cheapest 
method of presenting textual matter in print- 
face type, in editions up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process de- 
mands spacing of six lines to the inch re- 
gardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 point). 
Ilustrations, even half tones, can be combined 
with text at no greater cost than for printing, 
if curved plates are provided. The most eco- 
nomical Mimeoform format is an 8-1/2" by 11" 
page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for 
printing form letters, becomes a factor in the 
field of reproduction, when used in combina- 
tion with type-setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of repro- 
duction has been made by Mimeoform Press, 
1320 F Street, N. W., Washington, D. C., un- 
der the direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch. 


AN ECONOMICAL MIMEOFORM FORMAT 


















The Multigraph, employed ¢: y rm let- 
ters, becomes a factor in the field of rep 


ton, D. C., under the dir 
styles his process the Mi 
a Lanston monotype fo 
which delivers the line of sh 
tified, to the channels of the 
doing away with galley proof. P, 
tions are quickly made away from 
combined with makeup, and runni 
are smaller than the cost of ma 
press; the Mimeoform Process, 
od of presenting textual matter in 
up to five hundred. 

Publishing by Mimeoform Process demands spacing of 
six lines to the inch regardless of type size (8, 10, and 12 
point). Illustrations, even half tones, can be combined with 
text at no greater cost than for printing, if curved plates are 
provided. The most economical Mimeoform format is an 
8-1/2'' by 11" page, set in ten-point type. 

The Multigraph, employed chiefly for printing form let- 
ters, becomes a factor in the field of reproduction, when used 
in combination with type-setting machinery. 

The best adaptation in the field of reproduction has been 
made by Mimeoform Press, 1320 F Street, N. W., Washing- 
ton, D. C., under the direction of Mr. Ernest Kletsch, who 
styles his process the Mimeoform Process. Mr. Kletsch uses 
a Lanston monotype for setting type, with a special take off, 
which delivers the line of short type, properly spaced and jus- 
tified, to the channels of the multigraph drum in page form, 
doing away with galley proof. Proof reading done, correc- 
tions are quickly made away from caster. Type-setting is 
combined with makeup, and running costs, in small editions, 
are smaller than the cost of making signatures for the flat-bed 
press; the Mimeoform Process, therefore, is the cheapest meth- 
od of presenting textual matter in print-face type, in editions 
up to five hundred. 


PRINTED BOOKS 


printing to the purpose of book production 
has been made by the Mimeoform Service un- 
der the direction of Dr. Ernest Kletsch, 
who styles his process the mimeoform proc- 
ess. He uses a Lanston Monotype for set- 
ting the type, which is cast in a low type 
mold, 8-, 10-, or 12-point. A special 
caster (the only part of his equipment that 
may not be found in almost any establish- 
ment supplying multigraph shops with compo- 
sition) automatically delivers the line of 
short type, properly spaced and justified, 
to the channels of the multigraph drum. 
When the drum is filled, the caster auto- 
matically stops. It takes only half a min- 
ute to fit the drum to the multigraph ma- 
Chine, and the printing can begin. Proof- 
reading is done immediately, and correc- 
tions are quickly made from the case of 
type. 

There are certain defects in the 
appearance of the finished mimeoform prod- 
uct. Within the range of type sizes from 
6-point to 12-point, all the type faces 
available for monotype composition are 
available for multigraph composition, and 
pages are produced by the multigraph with 
all the features of print-face, such as 
Justified lines, italics, bold-face, etc. 
But the appearance of the printed page 
sometimes displays certain imperfections. 
As the type is transferred to the channels 
of the-drum, it occasionally slips up or 
down or slightly awry. This results not 
only in a poor alignment of type, but in 
some cases in an indistinct impression. In 
general, the product of the mimeoform does 
not approach the highest quality of the 
flat-bed cylinder press. 

Amina ta plone is norma tease ales OmuebO 
be noticed. The space between the channels 
on the multigraph drum, into which the 
short type is transferred by the caster, is 
fixed, permitting not more than six lines 
to the inch, regardless of size of type. 
Thus all four type sizes available (6-, 8-, 
10-, and 12-point) are cast on a 12-point 
body (note Figure VI, set in 12-point and 
8-point type). This means that lines of 


AND REPRINTS ae) 
10-point type, the most commonly used for 
book composition, would be leaded two 
points; 8-point type, four points; and 6- 
point type, used for footnotes, six points. 
For spacing between paragraphs, a channel 
of the drum would be left empty. In 10- 
point composition the loss in compactness 
over ordinary composition leaded one point 


'is about 30%, and this percentage increases 


as the size of the type decreases. The waste 
of space is particularly great in footnote 
work. The effect of this wastage of paper 
area can be neutralized by using the full 
surface of the drum and printing upon a 
large page, 81/2" x 11". Running costs 
are the same for this large page as for a 
smaller one, and indeed, in the writer's 
opinion, the best possible format for mimeo- 
form work is an 8 1/2" x 11" page set in 
10-point type in two columns (Figure VII). 
One further limitation of the multi- 
graph as a book-printing device must be 
mentioned: it is quite unsuited to any 
publishing in which illustrative material 
is to be put on the same page with textual 
matter. Although it is possible to incor- 
porate line cuts or coarse screen half 
tones in a page of matter produced on the 
multigraph by purchasing small curved elec-— 
trotypes of the illustrative material, the 
cost is such that it is more economical to 
use some other process--e.g., photo-offset 
--for highly illustrated text. On the 
other hand, if illustrations are on sepa- 
rate pages, the multigraph is well suited 
to their use, because they do not have to 
be interleaved in signatures but can be 
gathered for binding like any other pages. 
The mimeoform process of multigraph 
printing is useful for the production of 
scholarly books when the edition is in the 
region of 100 to 500. Considerable sav- 
ings over. ordinary printing are here ef- 
fected because composition costs are re- 
duced, in some measure, by wage-scale fac-— 
tors and by the very difficulty of making 
author's corrections which tends to en- 
force upon authors practices that would be 
equally effective in reducing printing costs. 


6. Other names for similar multigraph services are Mimeo-Gravure and Mimeo-Photo. 
7. The multigraph interferes somewhat with the working habit of scholars who expect to receive proofs of 


a 300-page book, leave them on the desk for a week, and correct them when they "get to it." 


The 


Mimeoform Service does not at present have the equipment for holding so many pages in type pending sub- 
mission of the proof to and by the author, and the office routine is based on the assumption that the 


proofreader alone, not the author, will be responsible for final correction. 
changed by an extension of equipment and a change of routine. 


slight increase in costs. 


This situation could be 
The effect of the change would be a 


20 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





Area costs are held down because make-up is 
eliminated, being combined with typesetting, 
and because there is no make-ready, and it 
is in area costs that the principal savings 
occur. Running costs are higher in propor- 
tion than printing press running costs be- 
cause each page is run separately; for that 
reason, printing will always catch up with 
and pass mimeoform, if the edition is large 
enough; but in the reslon voit i00 tron S00. 
running costs are so small a part of the to- 
tal costs that the economy of the flat-bed 
press in printing sixteen pages at a time 


is of small importance. 

The following figures show the com- 
parative prices of mimeoform and flat-bed 
cylinder publication, and show the mimeo- 
form process lowest in cost as a means of 
presenting straight textual matter in print- 
face type in small editions. The advan- 
tage of the mimeoform fades out when the 
size of the edition passes the 600 mark. 
The costs per page as here quoted in 19354 
are within the range of those that Bean 
found normal in 1927--from $2.25 to $4.00. 


TABLE IV 


ESTIMATE FOR COMPOSING AND PRINTING BY MIMEOFORM AND STRAIGHT PRINTING 


A BOOK OF 50,000 WORDS, 6" 


x 9" TRIM SIZH, 128 PAGES 


(Not an economy format for either process) 


PROCESS 


$179.20 


$198.40 | $217.60 | $236.80 
$286.68 | $289.00 | $290.00 | $294.66 | $298.17 | $301.87 | $305.36 


Mimeoform 


Printing (a composite of 
five estimates) 


EDITION SIZE AND ESTIMATE 


500 


600 


TABLE V 


ESTIMATE FOR COMPOSING AND PRINTING A BOOK OF 50,000 WORDS 
IN VARIOUS FORMATS 


PROCESS 


EDITION SIZE AND ESTIMATE 





100 SO 


Mimeoform 
(8 1/2" x 11" trim size 
imeLOhpt., 2) cols.) 

eee le 
(ere/ 4th 9 1/2 trian 
Suzene J=pib. on le Gran= 
jon, 2 cols.--newsprint 
format) 

Printing 
hifj2" x li" trim size', 
7=pt. solid, 6 cols.—- 
economy format) 


$143.00 | $143.00 


oan 


$280.00 | $285.00 





$300.00 | $308.50 


Note: 
age of five quotations on a less economical format. 





200 


500 400 500 600 


$143.00 | $160.00 | $177.00 | $194.00 | $211.00 












$290.00 | $299.00 | $307.00 | $315.00 


$323.00 
es 











$317.00 | $334.00. | $250.00 | $365.00 | $380.00 


The quotation on the "economy format" from one firm turned out to be higher than the aver- 


If the specifications had been sent out for quota- 
tions to the five firms who estimated for the upper table, the price would be lower. 


The point of this 


table is to compare estimates on a newsprint format with estimates on a good sound book format. 








SS a= 


ae 
| 


2 OS aS ee 


Py ' 








FIGURE X 


The Rotaprint 














i ' 
Ne pe ecrnrnt EIT 


FIGURE XI 


Model 200 Multilith 


PRINTED BOOKS 


AND REPRINTS we 





Alternatives to Printing 

Litem cece tmp le LUmem tia be pirG— 
ing presents to the scholar. If the prob- 
lems of scholarly publishing are not met at 
this cost level, the alternative to be stud-— 
ied is the use of typescript reproduced by 
photo-offset, the mimeograph or hectograph, 
or by some photographic process. Of these, 
photo-offset is the most frequently applied 
to book production. The first use of these 
processes is found in bringing back into 
print materials already available in print- 
ed form; but they can also be used for pub- 
lishing new matter from typescript. How- 
ever, these processes can be most clearly 
analyzed as devices for reprinting, and 
they will therefore be described in that 
connection. 


Reprinting: the Photo-offset Process 

The process known as photolithogra- 
phy, photo-offset, lithoprinting, offset 
printing, planograph printing, and a number 
of trade or firm names, has developed in 
the last thirty years from the combined ap- 
plication of the principles of lithography 
and photography, together with a new type 
of printing press. 

Lithography was developed by apply- 
ing the principle that grease repels water, 
Ditteaboraccs a greasy ink. The process wails 
discovered in 1796 by Alois Senefelder of 
Munich, who used the limestone of Solen- 
hofen, Bavaria, which was especially good 
for absorbing water and taking grease. A 
stone surface was covered with the greasy 
marks of a lithographic pencil, then mois- 
tened and then inked. The ink would adhere 
to the pencil marks, avoid the moistened 
spaces, and transfer to paper as a litho- 
graphic print. This direct method from 
stone to paper necessitated the image to be 
drawn or imposed on the stone in reverse. 

The same principle is applied in 
the photo-offset process, which is fundamen- 
tally lithographic in character. A photo- 
graphic image is transferred, via a nega- 
tive, to a metal plate covered with a light- 








sensitive emulsion (albumen with ammonium 
bichromate). An exposure to an are light 
hardens the portions of the emulsion under 
the transparent parts of the negative so 
that they remain on the plate after develop- 
ment as an image of the copy to be repro- 
duced. Thus. the process is photographic. A 
sample sheet of the negative (Figure VIII) 
and a sample piece of a used metal sheet 
from the multilith (Figure IX) are bound 
herewith. 

The emulsion image is of such a 
character that it is receptive to greasy 
ink. The plate, therefore, may be placed 
upon a press which moistens it (the mois- 
ture adheres to the parts of the plate not 
carrying the hardened emulsion) and inks it 
(the greasy ink avoids the moistened sur- 
faces of the plate, but sticks to the emul- 
Sion image). The printing surface is flat; 
it has no raised surfaces like type faces, 
no sunken intaglios; hence the name "plano- 
ra wwce 

The third element of the process is 
the offset press. The first practical off- 
set press, upon which flat-surface metal 
plates could be used, was developed in 
1906. A few years earlier Ira W. Rubel, a 
lithographer of Nutley, New Jersey, con- 
ceived the idea of developing an offset 
press while watching a feeder operate a 
cylinder press. When the feeder missed a 
sheet, as sometimes happens, there was 
made on the tympan sheet an impression 
which offset on the back of the next sheet 
and produced a better print than the one 
Rubel was getting by direct impression. He 
thereupon developed an offset press in 
which a reversed image was printed by the 
flat-surfaced plate on a rubber blanket, 
from which the wet impression was offset on 
the paper sheet. It is this last feature 
which has given the whole process its name 
of "offset printing. "8 

For scholarly publication, two 
small offset presses, the "rotaprint" and 
the multilith (Figures X and XI), which 
are used by business offices doing small 


8. The two elements of the process--the photographic preparation of a metal printing surface and the use 


of a rubber blanket to "offset" the impression—-are not necessarily and indissolubly connected. 


There 


is one press, the Schwarze Presse or Coxhead Press, which brings the metal printing surface directly 


in contact with the paper. 


It is planographic in the sense that the printing surface is a plane, 


photographic in that the surface is prepared by photographic means, but it is not an offset process. 
The Schwarze or Coxhead process also differs from most planographic processes in that no negative is 


used in transferring an image to the metal. 
the image burned with an arc light. 


A drawing is laid directly on the sensitized metal and 
This process has its place, particularly in the multiplying of 


architects! drawings, but no extended analysis of it is required here. 


wo 
ww 


runs of advertising matter or publishing a 
house organ, deserve special attention. 
When soliciting business, the users of the 
large offset presses regard these smaller 
units as little better than office appli- 
ances; the users of the small presses chal- 
lenge this judgment. But in the presence 
of the NRA the large offset press people 
tried to make rotaprint and multilith come 
into the Graphic Arts Code, while they held 
out on the claim of being merely office ap- 
pliances. Examples of their work will en- 
able the reader to judge of their relative 
quality (see Figures XXV and XXVI in Chap- 
ter V). This volume is planographed with 

a Harris press (Figure XII), which has also 
been used in reproducing pictures in the 
chapter on illustrations. 


Photo-Offset: Composition Costs 
The composition of the text from 


which the photographic negative is produced 
is not actually part of the photo-offset 
process: in preparing a new book by photo- 
offset, either ordinary raised type compo- 
sition or typewriting would be used, and 
the factors affecting these costs are else- 
where discussed. If ordinary linotype com- 
position were resorted to with this proc- 
ess, no saving would be possible unless a 
considerable number of illustrations ap- 
peared; the production of typescript books 
by photo-offset will be examined in Chapter 
Vile 

In the present discussion photo- 
offset is being considered as a reprinting 
Gevice, and in. thescase of a reprint ef a 
book by this process, there is actually no 
composition whatever, the old book serving 
as master copy for the photographic part of 
the process. 


Photo-Offset: Area Costs 

In the photo-offset process cost 
penavLOr Ss controlled by «the thacn | Laat 
first costs in the shop are essentially 
area costs. It is to the area costs, that 
is, to the preparation of the photographic 
negative and to the making of the metal 
plates, that chief attention must be devot- 
ed. 


(a) The Photographic Negative 
In the preparation of the photo= 
graphic negative, various kinds of materi-— 











METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


als can be used. The photo-offset process 
was originally developed with wet-plate 
photography. This technique came to the 
photo-offset shop from the photoengraver. 
The photoengraver would coat a sheet of 
glass with albumen, collodion, and nitrate 
of silver in the order named, thus making a 
"wet plate." This wet plate would go into 
the camera and be developed and fixed as a 
photographic negative. It would then have 
its surface strengthened by applications of 
a liquid rubber solution and collodion. The 
result would be a "sandwich" of the photo- 
graphic silver image between two sheets of 
collodion adhering to the glass plate. Then 
the photoengraver would soak off the sand- 
wich with a bath of acetic acid and use it 
as a negative in preparing the metal sheet 
printing surface. More recently it has be- 
come the practice to use film rather than 
wet plate at this stage of the process, and 
now paper negative is taking the place of 
film for some kinds of work ees liemcos vane 
lationships of these three photographic 
media are approximately: 


Paper negative .... 1 
Hem Mee at al Vi urenstelemsmme) 
Wet plate 


When the material to be copied is of maxi- 
mum legibility, with ample contrast between 
its black and white, the paper negative 
(Photostat N-26, Kodalith, Contrasto Poly- 
graphic Company's product or Haloid Com— 
pany's Litholoid) is wholly satisfactory. 
According to an estimate made for the Joint 
Committee, the paper negatives required in 
preparing metal sheets for a book of 128 
pages, 6" x 9", would cost G5-i2.55 12 ue 
were used, the cost of the films would be 
$17.92. Thus a variation of $12.80,-0r ap— 
proximately 10% of a job priced at about 
$125.00 (exclusive of binding and paper 
costs) is controlled by the choice of film 
or paper negatives. On the other hand, 
when the copy is poor the photo-offset 
printer may be forced to use a wet plate 
negative.? 

It sometimes happens that there 
will be no way of bringing the original 
copy of the book to be reproduced to the 
photo=obiset, prim terse eink su Chmamce sic mmec| 
skilled photostat operator or commercial 
photographer, acting under instructions 


9. The Typary and Typon Company, 1-4 Red Lion Passage, Fleet Street, London, England, manufactures a 


SSeig STiiey 


TTX wdunold 


i 
4 
of 

es 


Le SF 


ney 








PRINTED BOOKS 


AND REPRINTS LO 





given him for the purpose, can prepare the 
paper negatives. The situation may bring 
about a separation of the photographic costs 
from the strictly photo-offset costs. The 
trade does not usually work on this basis, 
but figures received from several sources 
indicate that a discount of 18% to 30% can 
be given if satisfactory paper negatives 
are provided to the photolithographer.19 
Dnotwenr basis ter calculating this cost is 
found in the difference between the origi- 
nal and reprint quotations when the photo- 
lithographer has preserved the negatives 
for the book, but not the metal sheets. 
This discount when given runs near to 15%. 


(b) The Preparation of the Metal Plate 
However, in computing area 'costs, 
the preparation of the metal plate is a 
more important factor than the making of 
the photographic negatives. The price per 





area of photo-offset printing surface has 
been calculated by Fred W. Hoch, author of 
the Standard Book of Estimating for Print- 
ers, and published in the American Printer 
for June, 1932 (p. 55), as follows. Accord- 
ing to information recently received, these 
DENCE Seno moda mE GOMe EOS eC sim oT Tes maint 
appears that the price of photo-offset 
printing surface should be somewhere be- 
tween $2.14 and $2.41 per 100 square inches. 
These figures agree roughly with those ob- 
tained from certain firms in 19433 and with 
quotations obtained in 1931. 


(c) Full Utilization of Metal Plate Sur- 
face 
Since the printing surface of the 
metal plates constitutes the most important 
factor in the determination of area costs, 
photo-offset work pages should be planned 
Ome me Ot DAems Una ComOmm LIne mses uicr 





TABLE VI 


PRICES ON PHOTO-OFFSET PRINTING SURFACE 


First 100: Copies 


Per Additional 100's 


Seiler x 1" $ 2.00 $0.30 
8 L/e" x 14" Pre) 0.40 
Oly etx eM fa tO 0.40 
ee a eon 4.00 0.60 
BEA exc gel si7 St DDO 0.80 
Teas Lo" ei 0) 0.80 
Se Kono 8.00 1.00 
UIE Se peel IAL OC 1.40 
EO Rexam at IL Oe 1.40 
eo" x 54n ERG r OO 2.40 


(Footnote continued) "stripping paper." 





It resembles Kodalith paper except that the thin emulsion can be 
stripped dry off the paper base and transferred to the metal for the burning—in process. 


The emulsion 


stripped from the stripping paper is so much thinner than film or Kodalith paper that it is said to 
make a clearer image in the burning-in process and is therefore comparable to the wet plate in fine- 


ness. 


This paper is available in Germany at the firms of von Bayer in Leverkusen, Koln; the Mimosa— 


A.G., Dresden, Schandauerstrasse; the Baltische Papier-fabrik, Berlin, N. W. 7, Dorotheenstrasse 38. 
The typon paper can also be used for making negatives for photo-offset work without photograph-— 

ic apparatus, as in reflection copying; the paper is laid on top of the original to be copied, exposed 

10-20 seconds, developed by means of a special developer, and fixed, as usual. After drying, the emul- 


sion is stripped from a stripping paper. 
ably reduced. 


Through this process the cost of the negatives is consider— 
Many books such.as lexicons, law books, etc., are printed by this method. 


Photographic apparatus is being manufactured by Hoh un Hahne of Leipzig, Germany, which will 


produce negatives of book pages for photo-offset work at a great speed: 


it is apparatus with self-— 


acting bellows or dark slide, automatic shutters for exposure, and devices for the proper pagination 


and placing of the book. 


10. Figured on basis of quotations given for producing a book of 128 pages, 6" x 9", in an edition of fifty, 


exclusive of paper and binding costs. 


a4 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


This raises the question of the relation of 
pege, plate, and press sizes. 

There are on the market some eighty 
different sizes of offset presses, using 


metal sheets of eighty different dimensions. 


Yet such is the force and pressure of 
standardization in the trade that most op- 
erators will aver that all these variant 
sizes are best adapted to the two standard 
page sizes, 6" x 9", and 5 1/2" x 8 1/a" 
(and-its double, 6 172" xi"). These are, 
in fact, the page sizes that will divide 
most evenly into the standard cuts of book 
paper and bond paper. They are convenient, 
but they may turn out to be wasteful. 

For example, the rotaprint metal 
sheet, now officially known as Rotaplate, 
measures LLU x ia it willl cake pertect= 
ly two pages of normal typewriter size pa- 
perjeonl/e" x 11". A workine margin of 
1/2" may be needed. But suppose a book of 
OE eco Ul Cas DCm tine MMacmOIACo cr. No 
tess than 42% of the available printing 
surface would be wasted. In printing a 
booker 123 pages, 6 x 9") on this) ~ma— 
chine, sixty-four plates would be required, 
for no more than two pages could go on each 
plate. At $1.50 a plate, the cost would be 
$96.00, and of this about 427, or $40.00, 
18 wasted. Whoever would print 6" x 9" 
pages should find a printer with another 
SILAS) OM TeneSsisi, Mlual jon@ariayeatiayes jovevete slinky oieaiane 
some old book that happens to be printed in 
large-size typé, it might be advisable to 
weduce the si zequo one thar willetiG. even= 
ly, or with minimum wastage, on the metal 
Sheet of the press that will be used on the 
job. 


(d) Area Costs and Legibility 

The principle which permits this 
economy has wide application. Since the 
printing surface for the photo-offset proc- 
elo, is prepared. photographically, the mwa 
terial to be reproduced can be enlarged or 
reduced to any degree desired. The pur- 
chaser buys the use of a certain number of 











square inches of printing surface; it is 
almost immaterial to the printer what is 
contained within these dimensions. This 
opens the publisher to an interesting temp- 
tation. He can enormously reduce the! cost 
of reproducing any given text by reducing 
the size of the print. If he cuts the 
print in half; he inereases Teurlold aus 
amount of printed matter on his area of 
metal. Thus, it has been proposed that the 
New York Times be issued in a half-size edi- 
tion for permanent preservation. 

The ease with which photo-offset 
printers can enlarge or reduce the size of 
the matter they copy, taken in connection 
with the controlling posi clon om aneamcocinc, 
gives to the problem of legibility a spe- 
cial importance. The size of the type-face 
can be fixed at any point, from microscopic 
to above normal, and while the diameter is 
shrinking in arithmetical series--1,2,65,4, 
--the cost of producing the copies is 
shrinking in geometrical series--2,4,8,16. 
This situation creates a temptation to pull 
the size of the print down to the lowest 
point of legibility. There would seem to 
be several thresholds: first, the limiting 
size of the type that can be read without 
special 'strain or attention (eccordime sce 
Vernon, it is 6-point type); below tiie 
there is perhaps the smallest type that can 
be read without the use of a reading glass; 
and below that, the lower limit of reading 
glass efficiency.l1 Efforts have been made 
to use photo-offset at all these levels. 
The Hispanic Society has reprinted a rare 
Spanish dictionary in a reduction to one- 
Salvia (one alnntsy Yowenlyeatiayel tl size.t® The experi- 
ment of the New York Times with a miniature 
edition reduced 50% from 7-point type has 
been mentioned. These experiments together 
with others are appraised in Chapter X in 
connection with various optical devices for 
reading. For the present, it is necessary 
to collect such information sis) mayne senjeemle 
able on the effect of photo-offset reduc— 
tions OO Gy pe, unom lect pr listys wil cae oie 
naked eye. 





11. See table in Chapter X, page 116. 


le. "....the photographs used in reproducing the Covarrubias. 


Tesoro de la lengua castellana. o espanola 





we beg to report that the photographs used in reproducing the Covarrubias were made at the Hispanic 


Society. 
apochromatic lens. 


Each of the 1382 pages was photographed separately on a 5" x 7" panchromatic film, using an 
Glossy prints of these negatives were mounted on sheets of cardboard, nine prints 


to a sheet, and this material was sent to the Rudge Company for reproduction by the offset process. 


The microphotographic reproduction contained 154 pages. 


The reduction is six diameters to one." From 


letter of the Hispanic Society of America to Robert Binkley, February 18, 1922. 





Average loss of legibility in words read per second 


Relation between amounts of planographic reductions 
of newspaper print and floss in legibility 


UNH 
UAT 
UAL 


100 90 60 TO 6077-50 405 30720 10 O 
Scale of planographic reductions 





| 
eS 







"+ 


FLGURE ALET 


PRINTED BOOKS 
The Joint Committee on Materials 
for Research secured the help of Professors 
Donald G. Paterson and Miles A, Tinker of 
the University of Minnesota in examining 
this problem. By a speed-of-reading test 
these scholars studied the legibility of 
mewsprint of normal size (7-point) and 
newsprint reduced to 80%, 50% and 30% of 
normal size. The result of their work isa 
curve of diminishing legibility, as shown 
et eure Koel 
To summarize: the relationships of 
legibility, type Size, and area cost. in 
HATO Onmmscusares suc tiat costs of mul ti 
plying materials by this method must always 
be reckoned to include the type size and 
ToC DMeL ty nacho. —OUSG ace the scholar 
with a new book to be set up in type for 
hée printer will find costs depending on 
the number of words in the book rather than 
the size of the letters, so the scholar 
with an old book to be copied by photo- 
offset will find the costs depending on 
the size of the letters rather than the 
number of words. 


Photo-Offset: Reprint Economy 
An important cost element that must 


also be taken into account in evaluating 
the photo-offset process is that of re- 
print economy. The idea of "reprint econo- 
my" Sis-one of basic importance in alll pub— 
lishing accountancy. It deserves, there- 
fore, a close analysis. It has been show 
that publishing costs are of two kinds: 
PiosicCOsy and running Cost, and that the 
first cost is a composite of two elements, 
eompostblon Cost and area cost. If a book 
can be made to pay its way in an edition of 
2000, a reprint of the book, manufactured 
by the same process, could also be expect- 
ed to pay its way provided 2000 new pur- 
chasers should appear after the exhaustion 
bf the first edition. The number of pro- 
spective readers that can make a first edi- 
tion pay can always make a second edition 
pay. But under certain conditions, the 
number of readers required to make a sec- 
ond edition pay need not be as large as 
that required to make the first edition 
pay. This result will follow whenever some 
of the work that has been paid for, as the 
LiemeoimecOs GCM ace ta rSitmedin LOmmcan spe 
held over and used again without addition- 
PimcoOstimuan second edition. "lhe revolu= 
tionary importance of this element in the 








AND REPRINTS ; RO 


cost structure of text reproduction is re- 
alized most completely in microcopying, but 
the element is also present in relief 
printing and in photo-offset work. 

The printer from raised type can 
hold his type or change his form into an 
electrotype by printing it in wax and de- 
positing electrolytic copper in the wax 
matrix. He can then preserve the electro-— 
types and make a second printing without 
incurring any composition costs. But ellec= 
trotypes and stereotypes are almost out of 
the question except for large editions. The 
CLEOEROGyDemnO camo! moon Olpace, ane am DOO 
of 128 straight-type pages, will cost ap- 
proximately $1.50 a page unmounted, $2.00 
a page mounted. The corresponding photo- 
offset device is to preserve the metal 
sheets, protected with a coating of gum and 
Ready BOR Vas seconds Pum. 

Some firms do not save the metal 
sheets, but save rather the photographic 
negatives from which they were prepared. 
The policies of photo"offset companies dif- 
fer in the matter of passing on to the con- 
sumer the reprint economies made possible 
by saving the metal sheet or negative. Some 
policies and economies are here described 
HOME NOSES Ole Wi SiGisa Gaon: 


Edwards Brothers, Ann Arbor. Preserves 
metal sheets free of charge. If cost of 


PITS tari teeoi 0 Core tire te 100 Coples, 
cost of second run will be $.83, a dif- 
ference of almost 50%. 


National Process Company, 75 Varick Street, 
New York. Saves the metal sheet, charging 


Cie SOe por costlor storane. nis iss usnal— 
ly a sheet covering sixteen pages, so that 
ties cost tS) apo ~.095 a page. if the 
Cost OL thes first runvais) 61.50) per page 
for 100 prints, and sheets are saved, cost 
of second run, including charge for stor- 
aC. cnasoO permpape tor 150 princs, aa 
difference of 42%. 


Chicago Planograph Corporation, 517 South 


Jefferson Street, Chicago. Retains all 
negatives, and, if customer desires, plates 


as well. "Certain percentage" of reduc- 
tion given on reruns. 


the Copityer Corporation of Ohio, Ili Power 
Avenue, Cleveland. Keeps plates and nega- 


tives until the customer releases them. No 


26 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





charge is made for negatives, but a charge 
of $1.00 per plate is made after three 
months. 


the Tudor Press, Inc., 251 Causeway Street, 


Boston. Holds plates and negatives for 
one year, and after one year, if ordered. 
Reprints made at approximately $.50 per 
page Less.) iL cost Of first runs as 
$125.00 (exclusive of binding and paper 
costs) and sheets are saved, cost of sec- 
ond run is $61.00, a difference of 

i eerie 


William B. Burford Printing Company, 
58 South Meridian Street, Indianapolis. 
Saves both plates and negatives for six 
months without storage charge, allowing 
50% reduction for reprints. 


R. RK. Donnelleyand Sons Company, 550 East 
ee Street, Chicago. Saves negatives with- 


out charge indefinitely. Plates can be 
saved on request for a short period for 
reruns. If plates cannot be used after 
this period, a charge is made for making 
new ones. 


The importance of reprint economy 
is twofold. It can lower the cost of cer- 
baimespeciiic printings of books..and eit 
can affect policy in regard to overprints. 
If a second printing is cheaply available, 
it is not necessary to risk large first 
printings that may remain unsold. 


Photo-Offset: the Outlook for the Future 
The development of the photo-offset 


apparatus as an additional shop equipment for 





letterpress printers has already had an im- 
portant influence on scholarship through 
the production of cheap reprints. ina G 
least one instance--the making of the new 
Early Modern English and Middle English Dic- 
tionaries under the sponsorship of the Amer- 
ican Council of Learned Societies--it has 
resulted in an extraordinary saving of 
scholarly labor. The editors of these new 
dictionaries have selected the writings of 
this period to be used in the dictionaries. 
The manuscripts and early prints have been 
reproduced by photo-offset and set before 
the scholars in loose-leaf form--about 200 
impressions of each page. The scholar 
takes one page and marks in it all the 
words to be indexed. A typist then takes 
one loose-leaf for each word marked by the 
scholar, types the marked work at the top 
of the leaf and files it alphabetically. 
This method would seem to reduce the making 
of concordances to an almost wholly mechan- 
ical procedure. 

What kinds of technological de- 
velopments of photolithography would be 
likely to have an important impact on 
scholarship? Nothing that affects the 
cost levels of the very long runs will have 
any significance.15 But if the time should 
come when the apparatus would be so far 
simplified and the process so far cheapened 
that it could become a kind of multiple 
photostat,a part of the equipment of any 
large library and serviced by ordinary li- 
brary idabor, turning out extra copies of 
library rarities for sale or exchange with 
other libraries and sometimes multiplying 
overused library materials for teaching 
purposes, great results in the intellectual 


13. Technological developments having their principal bearing on long-run work are the Uhertype apparatus, 
consisting of a photo-composing machine, by which letters are photographed on a film strip, and a 


make-up machine, which is a large reproducing camera; The Telet 


esetter, which operates slug-casting 


machines automatically with perforated tape; the Typary, producing proof slips, photoprinted on paper, 
which may be used to make negatives from which positives are produced on offset metal plates; some— 
times translucent paper is used in the machine to make proofs which can be used directly on the metal 
plates; the Typon, employed for photo-production with the Typary by camera or contact, in which a pa— 
per strip film is used instead of a dry or wet plate; Walton's typesetting machine, which writes di- 


rectly on a metal sheet for offset printing; various other devices activated by the photoelectric 


cell. 


In offset printing, important experiments are being made in mercury processes, in which mer- 


cury is used instead of water as an ink-repelling medium; in developing formulae for producing deep- 


etched plates; in 


offset, when the plate is treated with an ink repellent, which does away with 


the moistening rollers of the offset press and controls both the temperature of the plate and the hu- 
midity of the air around the plate, thus providing and keeping constant the moisture needed through- 


out the run. 


Cf. Printing Progress, a report prepared by a special committee of the Printing Indus-— 


tries Division for the Engineering Week Meeting, June 25-July 1, 1933. 


bine t Wf HM Ata 
earns 4" bow ent aee capa 


7 tetas ah er ee ae =" ey cy  tabateabasondnanieaioan 
ays Po 
OF O00 Seen: sien ween, NS ie wee ; 















7° 
' er Vefia et eee, 
TW Smack ai Tak ANE Pipi +s Nhe Be 


' WAR As hd cs \ pat ee 
MB rh TS ese aE). aaa 
LOR TD jemaitiatn an etuet 0, 'a Oe >: Tae 
Pe AMBRE CUR! GR: RN Sy Se 
} fea" 
Oster SORES 0s se wen nae + Tee, s 


mer eeri y LF & Gi ws Rte! i yar / 

mh a a ca eal Wied tasks ae vp vy a 7 
pen La eee sey Me 38 

ee RAK RN RA I 4 BR 

Pe LeteeS Oo Lona ti: ' 

Bee reas cols, ai Ay hw ak hy 


oboe. uk s 






Rat 


we, 
FR 
cS 





= 


Peme cas o% Fak as a > ine 

: BARN Tene ae dhe 

ai. ; site . Ne e. > 
TATis 








oe AE gs " ) . 5 oA 3 
. LAS 
en » gr oA 


1g bows Abidin apiahentin | 
fhe Ro soy oe Named siestrok duck bliw 
SO fee 2c) cient ton ait sadist IoBlowara along 

eb ed sw mi esti v0 &) Toane yrove sfomere! sew 
> eae aovede tos emebasdinno daton has sash 
wyswele sade?  exissarndngaininmos soon rises 

8 20%) sw agbidder 92 to nobssr yd 

io sini @ sb soale, oct sascler sev bycbond = (iid. Yo 
mR peppery Ie the ani torts chides Jbsuaiton basitsh ishest 
stusa ioe i See am aaouaien ao ae 


mu tountiow tea' ts = 
oa dil 
ang ei arade 

















LIB. IL. The Pyrartides. 


Baa i ll ei i Hii! 


NY 4A 
Ih: 'yitllh 
, WW 


ad 


" 


f 
al 

Pi ye Im. 

i; 





! 


Pibla leas Hail! Clin. 


Se aca de 








ea abr ; 
\eE , f entrance in to the 
Fess as teat Pyramis sed 


ees ery 


to have done us a mifchief; and guarded the mouth whilft we entred, for fearof the 
wild Arabs. To take the better footing, we put off our hoes, and moft of our ap- 
parcels fore-toldof the heat within not inferiour toa Stove. Our guide (a Moor :) 
went foremoft: every one of us with our lights in our hands. A moft dreadful pat- 
fage, andnolefs cumberfom; not above a yard in breadth, and four feet in height, 
each ftone containing that meafure. So that always ftooping, and fometimes creep- 
ing, by reafon of the rubbidge, we defcended (not by ftairs, but as down the fteep 
of ahill) a hundred feet, where the place for a little circuit enlarged, and the 
fearful defcend continued, which they fay none ever durft attempt any farther, fave 
that a Baffz of Cairo, curious to {earch into the fecrets thereof, caufed divers condem- 
ned perfons to undertake the performance, well ftozed with lights, and other provi- 
fion; and that fome of them afcended again well-nigh chisty miles off in the Defarts. 
A Fable deviled only to beget wonder. But others have written, that at the bottom 
there isa fpaciousPit, eighty anc fix Cubits deep, filied at th: over-flow by conceal- 
ed Conduits: inthe midita little Ifland, and on that 2 fomb containing the body of 
Cheops, a King of Egypt, and the builder of this ?yramis: which with the truth 
hath a greater affinity. For fince Ihave been told »y one out of his own experience, 
that in the uppermoft depth there is a large {quare ploce, (though without water} 
into which he was led by another entry openiny to the South, known but unto 
few (that now open, being thut by fome order) and entred at this place where we 
feared to defcend. A turning on the right hand jeadeth into a little room: which 
by reafon of the noyfom favour and unezfie pailage, we refufed to enter. 
Clambering over the mouth of the aforefaid dungeon, we @fcended as upon the bow 


of anarch, the way no larger than the former, about an hundred and twenty feet. 
K 3 Here 


10ft 


PRINTED BOOKS 


world would be likely to follow. How far 
is technology from that possibility? Cer- 
tain. new developments tending in this di- 
rection have come to the knowledge of the 
writer, but must for the time being be 
kept confidential. 

The rotaprint was the first ma-— 
chine to offer itself as a piece of office 
equipment. The cost of a rotaprint instal- 
lation is about $1000 (9" x 14" model, 
friction feed; suction feed, about $1575). 
ine latvest rotaprint model, R 50, ts 
$660.00 complete. Compare this with the 
price of photostat equipment, which is 
$800. Then came the multilith, offering 
an installation for $630.00 (friction feed, 
ia its standard size, 9 1/2" x 12 1/2" 
printing surface, 10" x 14" paper). There 
has been developed a combination mimeo- 
graph and offset press which will permit a 
changing over from the mimeograph stencil, 
inked from the inside, to a photo-offset 
metal plate, inked from the outside. There 
is some possibility that a system may be 
devised whereby a kind of photostat paper 
can be treated to become a printing sur- 
face, The operator would make a photostat 
copy of a page, treat the photostat nega- 
tive, fasten it on a small press, and run 
off a number of copies. New developments 
are appearing every year. The major insti- 
tutional changes in scholarship can be ex- 
pected to begin with the development of a 
photo-offset process so simple that the 
printing surface is prepared at the area 
cost level of the photostat copy and the 
running costs of making copies stand at the 
cost level of the mimeograph,. 


Reprint Processes: Dermaprint 
The dermaprint is at present the 


process that tends toward this desideratum. 
It is a photographic process tied to the 
mimeograph. It is not planographic nor 
does it use the offset principle, but it 
does the same kind of work that the cheaper 
offset presses do. The relative fineness 
of the products of these processes can be 
compared if the sample dermaprint page 
bound herewith (Figure XIV) is compared 
with the sample products of the multilith 
and rotaprint (Figures XXV and XXVI). 

The page to be dermaprinted was 
selected because it was yellowed with age 
and contained a line cut. The standard 
charge of the A. B. Dick Company for an 





AND REPRINTS on 





8 1/2" x 11" dermaprint stencil is $3.50, 
which includes a small amount of retouch- 
ing. If a considerable amount of retouch- 
ing is necessary, there is a standard ex- 
tra charge of $1.00 per hour. The cost of 
the materials needed to make this particu- 
lar stencil was $.64, which included a 
film negative and a film positive. Had a 
paper negative and a paper positive been 
used, the materials cost would have been 
somewhat lower. One hour and forty-five 
minutes were needed for the preparation of 
the stencil. 

While the A. B. Dick Company gave 
their very generous cooperation in the 
preparation of the dermaprint stencil re- 
produced here, they call attention to the 
fact that, in general, the dermaprint proc-— 
ess at the present time is more to be used 
with direct contact prints than with the 
use of the camera. The reader may judge 
for himself, by comparing the dermaprint 
product shown here with the cost calcula- 
tions given above, what place dermaprinting 
can have in the reproduction of research 
materials. 

The dermaprint stencil resembles 
the ordinary mimeograph stencil in appear- 
ance. It is a fibrous sheet impregnated 
with a substance impervious to ink. But 
whereas the ordinary mimeograph stencil is 
impregnated with a material resembling wax, 
which can be mechanically abraded by the 
typewriter stroke until the ink will pene- 
trate through the bruised parts, the derma- 
print stencil is impregnated with some kind 
of gelatinlike substance which is subject 
to tanning or toughening in the presence 
of the chromate ion. Whereas ordinary gela- 
tin will dissolve in water, a gelatin that 
has been tanned will resist water. This 
is the chemical principle upon which the 
dermaprint works. 

The raw sheet, already covered with 
a gelatin, is sensitized with ammonium bi- 
chromate or, more commonly, potassium bi- 
chromate. Ultra-violet light on the potas- 
sium bichromate will release the chromate 
ions and tan the gelatin. It is only nec- 
essary, then, to subject to ultra-violet 
light those parts of the sheet that are to 
be kept ink-resistant. The dermaprint 
stencil must, therefore, be prepared by 
using a biack-on-white or positive photo- 
graph, or, as in the production of the so- 
ealled "special stencil," from ansoriginail 


28 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





black-on-white drawing on very thin or 
transparent paper, tracing cloth, vellun, 
or celluloid. "In this it -differssfrom the 
ordinary photo-offset metal sheet, whichis 
prepared as a printing surface by using a 
negative photograph. The light that reach- 
es the surface of the offset metal sheet 
hardens upon the metal the substance that 
will accept ink; the light that reaches the 
surface of the dermaprint stencil hardens 
the substance that will resist ink and keep 
it from passing through. The positive 
photograph or the original drawing is 
pressed against the dermaprint sheet ina 
vacuum frame and exposed to an intense 
light. Then it is given a bath in warm 
water and dried. The warm water dissolves 
out that part of the gelatin which has 
been protected by black ink from the rays 
of the light, but leaves the other part in- 
tact. Thus a stencil has been prepared 
automatically. 


The cost of equipment for the derm- 
aprint comes into the same price range with 
the cost of multilith apparatus unless the 
photostat and the mimeograph have already 
been purchased.14 


Estimated Cost of dermaprint equipment if 
mimeograph and photostat are available 
eeov4e2eveecenvne eee eee esses ee @ $23.00 sad $350.00 


Estimated cost of dermaprint equipment, in- 
cluding photographic and mimeograph appa- 
PALUS gave's vies eS Oe ld Ge we wlaeeteoly ees enUa Gd imma 


The cost of printing surface for 
the dermaprint process as compared with 
rotaprint and multilith metal sheets is 
shown in Table VII below. 

The supplementary photographic sup- 
plies needed for the dermaprint should nor- 
mally cost more than those for photo-offset, 
except in the case of the direct method, 


TABLE VII 


COST OF PRINTING SURFACE FOR DERMAPRINT, ROTAPRINT, AND 











MULTILITH 
; Pricesote Price per Price per 
Process eae ae A ae Stencil or 6" x gn SH Six 

Sd: a Metal Sheet™ Page Page 
Rotaprint 8 3/8" x 11" $.28 $.318 $.28 
Rotaprint 8 3/8" x 13" -28 ray eo 
Dermaprint 13 
Dermaprint | 7 1/4" x 14" .075 15 
Mul tilith 294 175 35 
Rotaprint 24 
Mul tii th 25 


*Prices in quantities of 100. 


14. The photographic equipment needed for transferring matter to the stencil may cost from $20.00 to 


$1300, with many possible combinations in between. 


The $20.00 equipment, which may be used for the 


direct process only, does not include a vacuum frame; the same equipment, with a $60.00 Eastman pres-— 


sure frame, costs $75.00, and with a vacuum frame, $150.00. 


This same equipment may be used to pre- 


pare the photographic stencils if the user purchases his film positives from a maker of offset plates. 
If a photostat and a special adapting holder are used, the equipment will cost about $260.00, figur- 

ing $85.00 for a holder, $155.00 for a vacuum frame, and about $20.00 for dark-room equipment; if the 
photostat prepares a film positive, the $23.00 equipment may be used, the total cost of the equipment 


being about $110.00. 


Mimeographs vary in price from $30.00 to $450.00. 


PRINTED BOOKS 


because the dermaprint must have a positive 
copy, while photo-offset can use the nega- 
tive. The photographer is through when he 
has made his negative for photo-offset, but 
if he is preparing for the dermaprint, he 
is only half through and must still make a 
positive from his negative.15 The cost of 
making this positive copy can be kept down 
if it is made by the filmslide process (see 
Chapter VI). Ordinarily the dermaprint 
uses just twice as much photographic paper 
as photo-offset. Moreover, it is not quite 
certain that the dermaprint can be pre- 
pared with a paper negative; if it turns 
out that film negatives are required, the 
cost of photographic materials mounts even 
further abave the level of the photograph- 
ic requirements of photo-offset. 


TABLE 


AND REPRINTS PAS 

Whether the dermaprint allows genu- 
ine operating economies is still an open 
question. The A. B. Dick Company offers to 
prepare these stencils, but the prices are 
so high that the service has no place in 
competition with other methods of book pro- 
duction. 

Customer installations make these 
prices less important. Tite Sav Bs) Datel: 
Company has decided definitely to sell the 
unsensitized stencils at $7.00 a package 
or $.145 each, in the legal size, as indi- 
cated in a recent letter to the Joint Com- 
mittee. Dermaprinting, therefore, would 
seem to be a practical reproduction method 
for any institution possessing photographic 
equipment and a mimeograph.16 


iValeTeNe 


PRICES OF DERMAPRINT SERVICE 








Original Letter size (Gel/2%x UL") s..e.c. $3.50 each stencil (Compare with 
stencils bevel isize (G51/2" 214") ..2.... 4.00 each stencil $1.25 to $2.00 

as the price of 
Duplicate Sige em See Mer belel tote aiele) ciareiererereies ie) alee Omeachnvs GENCiay preparing print- 
stencils IG GialaSu 7 Clmevatete nishete ctevare siecle cree es | os OO eCacCh dS tencaL ing surface and 

running 100 cop- 
Special (ets Cisme Sslb7, CMerebarstetetercuststcheiotelers cietsisieican oe omeack ss LeNCd ies by photo- 
stencils eS See © Mare a Nenei Ha velaisiactaiviniviacin in ea) os DoLeach: stenert. offset) 








15. A letter recently received indicates that a method has been devised whereby, without any further 
photographic process, the negative can be reversed into a positive. 
16. Another interesting device that has been used to some extent in Europe but has no practical importance 


in America is the Opalograph. 
eograph. 
resist ink. 
in preparing the master copy. 


in the film and reaching through to the porcelain slab. 
ing surface on a press not unlike a small flat—bed cylinder press. 


The Opalograph principle bears a faint resemblance to that of the mim-— 
A slab of porcelain-like composition receptive to ink has painted upon it a film that will 
This film can be cut by ammonia fumes. 
The master copy is imposed on the porcelain slab, thus cutting the text 


An ink which gives forth ammonia fumes is used 


The slab is then inked and used for a print-— 
There is a kind of special photo-— 


graphic film which can be prepared as a positive copy, impregnated with an ammonium substance and 
used to cut through to the ink-receptive stone. Thus the Opalograph might be used for the reproduc— 
tion of photographed texts, but the costs are high, and the process has no place in America. 

A process used in Germany to bring out-of-print books into print is the Manul or Beha proc— 
ess. This is a planographic process differing from the usual method only in the way in which nega- 
tives are made, before the image is burnt into the sensitized metal sheet. But in making these nega— 
tives, it is necessary to destroy two copies of the original book from which they are made, The proc- 
ess is one of the "direct copying" processes; that is to say, it dispenses with the use of the camera. 
Glass is covered with a light-sensitive emulsion. The page to be copied is laid on this glass, and 
light is reflected from beneath. Under the white parts of the paper, which reflect the light, the so- 
lution is rendered insoluble; under the dark parts it continues soluble. The substances useu are 
probably a gelatin and a chromate, as in the dermaprint. The whole glass is covered with an organic 


coloring matter. The soluble parts are washed away, leaving the negative copy of the original as a 


30 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





manufacturing costs by three processes-- 
printing, mimeoform, and photo-offset. 


The following table is a summary 
comparison of the factors affecting book 


TABLE IX 


PRINTING 





MIMEOFORM 






















Parsus Costs 
(composition) 


Varies directly with 
number of words or ems, 
and only slightly af- 
fected by type face, 
leading, etc. Time and 
a half and double time 
are charged for foot- 
notes, tabular matter, 
ower 


Hirst Costs 
(area) 


Make-up varies direct 
ly with number of 
forms and complexity 
of work) (e.2., foot 
OES Cruse en Siuste chine airs 
tapi larrmakber, bce). 
Make-ready varies in 
the same way as make- 
up. Neither is af- 
fected by size of 
edition. | 
Varies directly with 
Size of edition, num— 
ber om forms, grade 
of paper, and type of 
binding. 








Running Costs 


Varies directly with 
number of words or ems, 
and only slightly af- 
fected by type size, 
type face. Composi- 
tion about 30% less 
compact than for or- 
dinary primring. Cos 
reckoned on a page ba- 
sis. All type sizes 
on a 12-point body. 

No make-up since type 
US Me OMeh ete eulinyy 
transferred to multi- 
graph drum by mono- 
type caster. No make- 
ready. 


Variations similar to 
WMO) alah [Osage 
Since pages are print- 
ed separately, the 
biinidiine Neos Smranse 
above those of printed 
16-page signatures. 





Reprint Costs 





Electrotype takes 

$l bOsa page. This 
cost makes new compo- 
sition costs unneces-— 
Sku Ss ise Sino 
type or making stere- 
otypes and electro- 
types, new composi- 
tion costs are unnec- 
essary. 





None 








PHOTO-OFFSET 


No composition costs 
for reprinting. (The 
behavior of type- 
SCript Composition 
costs will be analyzed 
im thie nex chapters 


The step the equiva-— 
lent of make-up in 
printing is the prep- 
aration of plates. 
The cost equals that 
of make-up and make- 
ready in printing of 
small editions. Prac— 
tically no make- 
ready. 


Varlations ts ime ho 
Ghose in) pirdiaw aac, 
Binding costs rise 
Sve ib lye horsSivewial 
press. 





Storage of metal 
sheets at $.00 


to 
$.10 per page reduces 
cost by approximately 
50%; storage of nega-— 
tive by about 15%. 





(Footnote continued) kind of stencil upon the glass. 


little and peeled off. 


This stencil is backed with thin paper, dried a 
It is then a negative ready to be transferred to the metal sheet. 


The Manul 


process of the Ullman Company and the Beha process of Breitkopf and Hartel seem to be the same thing. 


The German firms offering to reproduce by this process indicate by their quotations that the saving is 
greater than is possible with straight photo-offset printing. 


